Illinois, session 104th, HB1545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.8    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 9required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 10equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 11defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 12greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 13or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 14exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 15obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 16regulations.17    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 18required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 19equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 20defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 21otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 22regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 23relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply   HB1545- 2 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1with other applicable rules or regulations.2    (c) (Blank). 3    (d) (Blank).4    (e) (Blank). 5    (f) As used in this Section:6    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 7output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 8Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 9Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 10    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 11sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 12calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 13greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 14by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 15CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 16them all together.17    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 18system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 19electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 20source.21    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 22have been identified by the United States Environmental 23Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.24    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 25fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 26cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate   HB1545- 3 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 2sale.3    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 4that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 5and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 6program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.7    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 8community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 9would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 10designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 11economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 12following areas:13        (1) areas where residents have been historically 14    excluded from economic opportunities, including 15    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 16    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 17    Tax Act; and18        (2) areas where residents have been historically 19    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 20    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 21    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 22    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 23    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.24    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 25means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 26investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and   HB1545- 4 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 2person means the following people:3        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 4    investment eligible community;5        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 6    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 7    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 8    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 9    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 10    the last 5 years;11        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 12    in the foster care system; or13        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.14    "Existing emissions" means: 15        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 16    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 17    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 18    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 19    that unit's operation; and20        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 21    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 22    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 23    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 24    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 25    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 26an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic   HB1545- 5 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 2copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 3electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 4energy source.5    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 6GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 7unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 8nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 9capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 10including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 11oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.12    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 13emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 14Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 15Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 16recent year for which data is available.17    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 18GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 19including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 20by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 21municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 22other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 23and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.24    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 25output emission rate" as measured by the United States 26Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation   HB1545- 6 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 2most recent year for which data is available.3    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 4use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 5shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 6zero no later than January 1, 2040 2030.7    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 8use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 9permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 10December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 11also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 12emissions by no later than January 1, 2045 2035. If the 13emissions reduction requirement is not achieved by December 1431, 2045 2035, the plant shall retire one or more units or 15otherwise reduce its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 16emissions by June 30, 2048 2038.17    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 18use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 19permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 20including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 21hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 22proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 23following:24        (1) No later than January 1, 2040 2030: all EGUs and 25    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx 26    emissions rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2   HB1545- 7 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1    emission rate of greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are 2    located in or within 3 miles of an environmental justice 3    community designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity 4    investment eligible community.5        (2) No later than January 1, 2050 2040: all EGUs and 6    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx 7    emission rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 8    emission rate greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not 9    located in or within 3 miles of an environmental justice 10    community designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity 11    investment eligible community. After January 1, 2045 2035, 12    each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall 13    reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing 14    emissions for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, 15    on average, 6 hours or less per day, measured over a 16    calendar year, and shall not run for more than 24 17    consecutive hours except in emergency conditions, as 18    designated by a Regional Transmission Organization or 19    Independent System Operator.20        (3) No later than January 1, 2045 2035: all EGUs and 21    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation 22    prior to September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public 23    Act 102-662), the effective date of this amendatory Act of 24    the 102nd General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of 25    less than or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate 26    less than or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or   HB1545- 8 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 2    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 3    eligible community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse 4    gas-emitting unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at 5    least 50% from its existing emissions for CO2e no later 6    than January 1, 2040 2030.7        (4) No later than January 1, 2050 2040: All remaining 8    EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a 9    heat rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such 10    EGU and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce 11    its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing 12    emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 2045 2035.13        (5) No later than January 1, 2055 2045: all remaining 14    EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 15    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 16use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 17permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 18including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 19hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 20proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2055 212045.22    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 23utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 24shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 25zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 26green hydrogen or other similar technology that is   HB1545- 9 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 2January 1, 2055 2045.3    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 4uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 5emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 6that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 7    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 8GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 9emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 10specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 11been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 12this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 13necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 14ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 15EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 16operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 17reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 18GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:19        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 20    participant in a regional transmission organization 21    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 22    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 23    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 24    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 25    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;26        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a   HB1545- 10 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1    participant in a regional transmission organization 2    receives notice that the regional transmission 3    organization has determined that continued operation of 4    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 5    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 6    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 7    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 8    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 9    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 10    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 11    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 12    identified by the regional transmission organization is 13    resolved; and14        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 15    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 16    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 17    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 18    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 19    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 20    Illinois Commerce Commission.21    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 22relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 23emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 24Section.25    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 26shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting   HB1545- 11 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 2units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 3the prior year.4    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 5Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 6Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 7publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 8State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 9development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 10emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 11developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 12current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 13reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 14years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 15Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 16Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 17Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 18Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 19regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 20anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 21development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 22unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 23The report shall be released publicly by no later than 24December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 25Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 26Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the   HB1545- 12 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 2energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 3and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 4the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 5subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 6adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 7sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 8MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 9regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 10transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 11will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 12the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 13Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 14or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 15requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 16to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 17State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 18deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 19reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 20with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 21appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 22energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 23development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 24resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.25        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 26    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold   HB1545- 13 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 2    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 3    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 4    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 5    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 6    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 7    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 8    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 9    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 10    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 11    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 12    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 13    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 14    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 15    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 16    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 17    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 18    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 19    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 20    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 21    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 22    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 23    approval.24        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 25    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 26    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the   HB1545- 14 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 2    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 4    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 5    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 6    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 7    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 8    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 9    mitigation plan within 180 days.10        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 11    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 12    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 13    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 14    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 15    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 16    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 17    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 18    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 19    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 20    increases in emissions.21        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 22    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 23    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 24    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 25    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 26    reduction requirements identified in the plan.   HB1545- 15 -LRB104 03410 BDA 13432 b1(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.)